Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7710
Indemnification of insurance producers.

An insurer shall indemnify, defend, and hold agents harmless from and against all liability, fees, and costs arising out of or relating to the actions, errors, or omissions of an insurance producer who obtains or uses credit information or insurance scores for an insurer if the insurance producer follows the instructions of or procedures established by the insurer and complies with any applicable law or regulation. Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide a consumer or other insured with a cause of action that does not exist in the absence of this section.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 10.